Hawaii statutes.
[§551E-5] Effective date of power of
attorney. (a) A power of attorney is effective when executed unless the
principal provides in the power of attorney that it becomes effective at a
future date or upon the occurrence of a future event or contingency.

(b) If a power of attorney becomes effective
upon the occurrence of a future event or contingency, the principal, in the
power of attorney, may authorize one or more persons to determine in a writing
or other record that the event or contingency has occurred.

(c) If a power of attorney becomes effective
upon the principal's incapacity and the principal has not authorized a person
to determine whether the principal is incapacitated, or the person authorized
is unable or unwilling to make the determination, the power of attorney becomes
effective upon a determination in a writing or other record by:

(1) A physician or licensed psychologist that the
principal has an impairment in the ability to receive and evaluate information
or make or communicate decisions even with the use of technological assistance;
or

(2) An attorney-at-law, a judge, or an appropriate
governmental official that the principal is incapacitated.

(d) A person authorized by the principal in
the power of attorney to determine that the principal is incapacitated may act
as the principal's personal representative pursuant to the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act, sections 1171 through 1179 of the Social
Security Act, title 42 United States Code section 1320d, as amended, and
applicable regulations, to obtain access to the principal's health care
information and communicate with the principal's health care provider. [L 2014,
c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next